Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
CHAPTER 250 Agricultural Seeds, Feeding Stuffs, and Fertilizers

250.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture.

“Concentrated commercial feeding stuff” includes linseed meals, corn and corncob meals, cocoanut meals, gluten feeds, gluten meals, germ feeds, corn feeds, starch feeds, sugar feeds, dried brewers’ grains, malt sprouts, dried distillers’ grains, dried beet refuse, hominy feeds, cerealine feeds, rice meals, rice bran, rice polish, peanut meals, oat feeds, corn and oat feeds, corn bran, wheat bran, wheat midlings, wheat shorts and other mill products, ground beef, fish scraps, mixed feeds, clover meal, alfalfa meal and feeds, pea-vine meal, cottonseed meal, velvet bean meal, feeds and meals mixed or unmixed, made from seeds or grains, and all materials of similar nature used for food for domestic animals, condimental feeds, poultry feeds, stock feeds, patented proprietary or trade and market stock, and poultry feeds.

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture.

“Director” means the director of the Agricultural Experiment Station or his designee.

“Experiment station” means the Agricultural Experiment Station.

“Weed seeds” means all seeds that are not agricultural, vegetable, or flower seeds. It includes noxious weed seeds.

History.

42h-1, 1376b-14, 1376b-15, 1719a-2: amend. Acts 1992, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 370, § 11, effective April 8, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Agriculture department, KRS ch. 246.

Grain warehouses, KRS ch. 251.

Livestock and poultry disease control, KRS ch. 257.

Marketing of agricultural products, KRS ch. 260.

Promotion of agriculture and horticulture, KRS ch. 247.

Seed stocks or foundation seeds; program for development of, KRS

247.086

.

Stockyards, KRS ch. 261.

Tobacco, KRS ch. 248.

Trade practices, KRS ch. 365.

Trees, plants, weeds and pests, KRS ch. 249.

Weights and measures, KRS ch. 363.